Louisiana, session 2026, HB757.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:320(J) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§320. Methods of taking freshwater or saltwater fish
* * *
J.(1) No person shall knowingly and intentionally authorize, direct, or have
control or ownership of an agent or vessel involved in the taking of menhaden for
commercial purposes within the area designated by the Department of Wildlife and
Fisheries pursuant to LAC 76:VII.307 of the Louisiana Administrative Code.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subpart A of Part II of Chapter 1 of
this Title, whoever violates the provisions of this Subsection shall be held strictly
liable for the taking and punished as follows:
(a) For a first violation, the violator shall be fined two thousand five hundred
dollars.
(b) For a second violation, the violator shall be fined five thousand dollars.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 757 ENROLLED
(c) For a third violation, the violator shall be fined seven thousand five
hundred dollars.
(3) For purposes of this Subsection, "person" means a natural person.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.